DI-60 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XG-01

DTC C1232/32 Deceleration Sensor Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Detection of eitherof conditions  1.and2.:

1. Atthevehiclespeedof ~ 10km/h (6 mph) or more, when
theconditionthatECUterminalGL 1 signalchange
range is less than 20 mV, and ECU terminal GL2 signal
change range swings by 468 mV or more occurs for 30

C1232/32 sec.ormore.

2.Atthevehiclespeedof  10km/h (6 mph) ormore, when
the condition that ECU terminal GL2 signal change

e Deceleration sensor
¢ Deceleration sensor circuit

rangeis lessthan20mV, and ECU terminal GL 1 signgl
change range swings by 468 mV or more occurs for 30
sec. or more.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the deceleration sensor circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC controls.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1 incaseofusingthehand -heldtesterand startfromstep2incase of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Checkoutputvalue of the deceleration sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthatthe deceleration value of the deceleration sensor displayed onthe hand -heldtesterischanging
when tilting the vehicle.
OK:
Deceleration value must be changing.

0K> Checkandreplace ABS & BA & TRC & VSCECU.
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2 [ Check deceleration sensor (See page DI-4).

NG> Replace deceleration sensor.

@

3 [ Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & BA & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

@

Cgeck and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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